Utah statutes.
16-6a-905.   Court-ordered indemnification of directors.
(1)  Unless a nonprofit corporation's bylaws provide otherwise, a director of
the nonprofit corporation who is or was a party to a proceeding may apply for
indemnification to:
(a)  the court conducting the proceeding; or
(b)  another court of competent jurisdiction.
(2)  On receipt of an application described in Subsection (1), the court,
after giving any notice the court considers necessary, may order
indemnification in the following manner:
(a)  if the court determines that the director is entitled to mandatory
indemnification under Section 16-6a-903, the court shall:
(i)  order indemnification; and
(ii)  order the nonprofit corporation to pay the director's reasonable
expenses incurred to obtain court-ordered indemnification; and
(b)  if the court determines that the director is fairly and reasonably
entitled to indemnification in view of all the relevant circumstances, whether
or not the director met the applicable standard of conduct set forth in
Section 16-6a-902 or was adjudged liable as described in Subsection
16-6a-902(4), the court may order indemnification as the court determines to
be proper, except that the indemnification with respect to any proceeding in
which liability has been adjudged in the circumstances described in Subsection
16-6a-902(4) is limited to reasonable expenses incurred.
